Idaho statutes. Title 59 PUBLIC OFFICERS IN GENERAL
Chapter 2
PROHIBITIONS AGAINST CONTRACTS WITH OFFICERS

Sec.

§ 59-201. Officers not to be interested in contracts. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 140, § 4, effective July 1, 2015. For present comparable provisions, see§ 74-501.

§ 59-201A. Remote interests. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 140, § 4, effective July 1, 2015. For present comparable provisions, see§ 74-502.

§ 59-202. Officers not to be interested in sales. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 140, § 4, effective July 1, 2015. For present comparable provisions, see§ 74-503.

§ 59-203. Prohibited contracts voidable. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 140, § 4, effective July 1, 2015. For present comparable provisions, see§ 74-504.

§ 59-204. Dealing in warrants prohibited. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 140, § 4, effective July 1, 2015. For present comparable provisions, see§ 74-505.

§ 59-205. Affidavit of nonviolation a prerequisite to allowance of accounts. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 140, § 4, effective July 1, 2015. For present comparable provisions, see§ 74-506.

§ 59-206. Provisions of chapter violated

Disbursing officer not to pay warrants. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 140, § 4, effective July 1, 2015. For present comparable provisions, see§ 74-507.

§ 59-207. Suspension of settlement or payment

Prosecution of offenders. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 140, § 4, effective July 1, 2015. For present comparable provisions, see§ 74-508.

§ 59-208. Violation. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 140, § 4, effective July 1, 2015. For present comparable provisions, see§ 74-509.

§ 59-209. Noncompensated public official

Exception. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 140, § 4, effective July 1, 2015. For present comparable provisions, see§ 74-510.

§ 59-210. Violation relating to public contracts. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 140, § 4, effective July 1, 2015. For present comparable provisions, see§ 74-511.